src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!LEXICON IV_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn
!+IV: V0_MEINNAD ;
!LEXICON TV_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn
!+TV: V0_MEINNAD ;
LEXICON V0_MEINNAD !!= * @CODE@ meinnad:meinn
!!! inflection_type="1"
! ** Yaml: __V-meinnad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! meinnad:meinn
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: meinnad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: meinn
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: meinna
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: meinnu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: meein
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: meeinež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: meeinas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: meinnu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: meinnaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: meinn»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1 meinnad
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2 meinn
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3 meinna
:%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_AD ; !4 meinnu
:^V2VV^YXX2YX%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 meein-
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 ERR
+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^YXX2YX%>as K ; !7 meeinas
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8 meinnu
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_AD ; ! meinn-
:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON V_REIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ reiddad:rẹ^1VOWidd
: V0_REIDDAD ;
!LEXICON IV_REIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ reiddad:rẹ^1VOWidd
!+IV: V0_REIDDAD ;
!LEXICON TV_REIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ reiddad:rẹ^1VOWidd
!+TV: V0_REIDDAD ;
LEXICON V0_REIDDAD !!= * @CODE@ reiddad:rẹ^1VOWidd
!!! inflection_type="1"
! ** Yaml: __V-reiddad__
! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! reiddad:reidd
! 1. The Ind.Prs.Sg3 form is a single syllable
! 1.2 The infinitive ends in ad
! 1.2.1 Has gradation
! 1.2.1.1 Monophthong 
! Stem is strong
! one vowel
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: reiddad
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: reidd
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: reidda
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: rijddu
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: reeid
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: reeidež
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: reeidas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: rijddu
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: reiddaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: reidd»

: VSUF-INF_AD ; !1 rẹiddad
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ; !2 rẹidd
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ; !3 rẹidda
:^VOWRaise^VXX2YXX VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_AD ; !4 rijddu
:^V2VV^YXX2YX%> VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 rẹẹid-
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ; !5 ERR
+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^YXX2YX%>as K ; !7 meeinas
:^VOWRaise^VXX2YXX VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ; !8 rijddu
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_AD ; ! rẹidd-
:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;


!! ### CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION
!LEXICON V_MUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
!: V0_MUQTTED ;
!LEXICON IV_MUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
!+IV: V0_MUQTTED ;
LEXICON TV_MUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
+TV: V0_MUQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_MUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ muʹtted:mutt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! seek parallel in RÕVVÂD
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: muʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mott
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: moʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3


!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:^V2VV^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) muuʹtt-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^V2VV^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: muuʹtt
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,


!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^V2VV^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: moottas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: muttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: mottaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: muʹt»
:^PAL^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+PrsPrc: muʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^V2VV VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: muutt


LEXICON V_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
: V0_PUUQTTED ;
!LEXICON IV_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
!+IV: V0_PUUQTTED ;
!LEXICON TV_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
!+TV: V0_PUUQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_PUUQTTED !!= * @CODE@ puuʹtted:puutt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! seek parallel in V_MUQTTED and V_JOAQTTED
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: puuʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poott
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: poʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3


!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VV2V^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:^VOWLower^PAL^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) pooʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: puuʹđ
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,


!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWLower^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: poođas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: puttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VV2V^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pottaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: puʹđ»
:^VV2V^PAL^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+PrsPrc: puuʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: puuđ-


LEXICON V_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
: V0_LAQDDED ;
!LEXICON IV_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
!+IV: V0_LAQDDED ;
!LEXICON TV_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
!+TV: V0_LAQDDED ;
LEXICON V0_LAQDDED !!= * @CODE@ laʹdded:ladd
!!! inflection_type="1"
! seek parallel in VIǮǮÂD
! FORMS
!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: laʹdded
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lädd
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
:^V2VV^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) laaʹdd-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^V2VV^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: laaʹdd
!! Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^V2VV^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: lääddas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: laddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: läddaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: laʹd»
:^PAL^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+PrsPrc: laʹddi

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^V2VV VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: laadd-

LEXICON V_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
: V0_VUEQTTED ;
!LEXICON IV_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
!+IV: V0_VUEQTTED ;
LEXICON TV_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
+TV: V0_VUEQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_VUEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹtted:vuâtt
!!! inflection_type="1"
!! like: V_JUEQKHKHED
! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel shift
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) lieʹđđed 
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		!!= * @CODE@ (2) leâđđ
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^PALÄ^PAL^CC2CCC%>e K ;     !!= * @CODE@ (3) leäʹđˈđe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) liõʹđˈđe
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:^PALE^PAL^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) lieʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!!   Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 lieʹđež
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 liõʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) leâđ-
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 liõđđu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
:^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ leâđˈđaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10) lieʹđ»
:^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL^CC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) liõʹđđi

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^VOWRaise^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: liõđ-

!LEXICON V_1E_UY/EQCC !!čueʹcced:čuâ{ʹØ}cc
! V0_1E_UY/EQCC ;
LEXICON IV_1E_UY/EQCC !!čueʹcced:čuâ{ʹØ}cc
+IV: V0_1E_UY/EQCC ;
